Arkansas, session 2025, SB94.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-112-302(e), concerning the requirements
for licensing of a new motor vehicle dealer, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) The Except as provided by subdivision (e)(2) of this section,
the applicant for a license as a new motor vehicle dealer shall furnish
satisfactory evidence that the applicant:
(1)(A) Maintains adequate space in the building or
structure wherein the applicant's established business is conducted for the
display of new motor vehicles or will have the facilities within a reasonable
time after receiving a license;
(2)(B) Has or will have adequate facilities in the
building or structure to perform repair and service work on motor vehicles
and adequate space for storage of new parts and accessories for the motor
vehicles; and
(3)(C) Will perform repair and warranty services on a
*ZRC008*
02-19-2025 14:51:46 ZRC008

As Engrossed: S1/27/25 S2/19/25 SB94
motor vehicle at the licensed location.
(2) A new all-terrain vehicle dealer or new low speed vehicle
dealer is not required to:
(A) Have a dedicated service and parts area inside of the
building or structure wherein the dealer's established business is conducted;
or
(B) Perform repair and warranty services on a motor
vehicle at the licensed location.
(3) A new all-terrain vehicle dealer or new low speed vehicle
dealer shall:
(A) Provide:
(i) Service of an all-terrain vehicle or low speed
vehicle sold by the new all-terrain vehicle dealer or new low speed vehicle
dealer; or
(ii) To the purchaser of the all-terrain vehicle or
low speed vehicle the name of a service provider within forty (40) miles of
the new all-terrain vehicle dealer or new low speed vehicle dealer that will
service the all-terrain vehicle or low speed vehicle sold by the new all-
terrain vehicle dealer or new low speed vehicle dealer to the purchaser;
(B) Provide a warranty or a manufacturer's warranty on an
all-terrain vehicle or low speed vehicle sold by the new all-terrain vehicle
dealer or new low speed vehicle dealer;
(C) Coordinate with a warranty service provider within
forty (40) miles of the new all-terrain vehicle dealer or new low speed
vehicle dealer to service the warranty or manufacturer's warranty provided
under subdivision (e)(3)(B) of this section;
(D) Submit the information concerning a service provider
or warranty service provider identified under subdivision (e)(3)(A)(ii) or
subdivision (e)(3)(C) of this section to the Arkansas Motor Vehicle
commission annually during the renewal of the license for the new all-terrain
vehicle dealer or new low speed vehicle dealer; and
(E) Provide information concerning a service provider or
warranty service provider identified under subdivision (e)(3)(A)(ii) or
subdivision (e)(3)(C) of this section to the purchaser of an all-terrain
vehicle or low speed vehicle sold by the new all-terrain vehicle dealer or
new low speed vehicle dealer.
02-19-2025 14:51:46 ZRC008

As Engrossed: S1/27/25 S2/19/25 SB94
(4) The Arkansas Motor Vehicle commission shall promulgate rules
to implement this section.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Application.
This act applies to all currently licensed new all-terrain vehicle
dealers and new low speed vehicle dealers and all applicants for a license as
a new all-terrain vehicle dealer or new low speed vehicle dealer.

/s/J. Dotson



























02-19-2025 14:51:46 ZRC008